src/fst/affixes/pronouns.lexc
LEXICON 1Sg
+Pro+Prs+1s+Nom+Stress+Gram/Liason:j # ;
+Pro+Prs+1s+Nom+Stress+Gram/Early:jo # ;
+Pro+Prs+1s+Nom+Stress+Gram/Late:je # ;
+Pro+Prs+1s+Nom+Stress+Err/Obsc:ja # ;
+Pro+Prs+1s+Nom+Stress+Err/Obsc:ge # ;
+Pro+Prs+1s+Nom+Stress+Err/Obsc:jeo # ;
+Pro+Prs+1s+Nom+Stress+Err/Obsc:iu # ; ! Verify. Looks right from corpus but very odd
+Pro+Prs+1s+Nom+Unstress+Gram/Early:jo # ;
+Pro+Prs+1s+Nom+Unstress+Gram/Late:je # ;
+Pro+Prs+1s+Nom+Unstress+Err/Obsc:ja # ;
+Pro+Prs+1s+Obl+Stress:mei # ;
+Pro+Prs+1s+Obl+Unstress:me # ;
+Pro+Prs+1s+Obl+Unstress+Gram/Liason:m # ;

+Pro+Poss+1s+Masc+Nom+Sg+Unstress:mes # ;
+Pro+Poss+1s+Masc+Nom+Sg+Unstress:mis # ;
+Pro+Poss+1s+Masc+Obl+Sg+Unstress:mon # ;
+Pro+Poss+1s+Masc+Obl+Sg+Unstress:mun # ;
+Pro+Poss+1s+Masc+Nom+Pl+Unstress:mi # ;
+Pro+Poss+1s+Masc+Obl+Pl+Unstress:mes # ;
+Pro+Poss+1s+Fem+Nom+Sg+Unstress:ma # ;
+Pro+Poss+1s+Fem+Nom+Sg+Unstress+Gram/Liason:m # ;
+Pro+Poss+1s+Fem+Obl+Sg+Unstress:ma # ;
+Pro+Poss+1s+Fem+Obl+Sg+Unstress+Gram/Liason:m # ;
+Pro+Poss+1s+Fem+Nom+Pl+Unstress:mes # ;
+Pro+Poss+1s+Fem+Obl+Pl+Unstress:mes # ;

+Pro+Poss+1s+Masc+Nom+Sg+Stress:miens # ;
+Pro+Poss+1s+Masc+Obl+Sg+Stress:mien # ;
+Pro+Poss+1s+Masc+Nom+Pl+Stress:mien # ;
+Pro+Poss+1s+Masc+Obl+Pl+Stress:miens # ;
+Pro+Poss+1s+Fem+Nom+Sg+Stress:meie # ;
+Pro+Poss+1s+Fem+Obl+Sg+Stress:meie # ;
+Pro+Poss+1s+Fem+Nom+Pl+Stress:moies # ;
+Pro+Poss+1s+Fem+Obl+Pl+Stress:moies # ;

LEXICON 2Sg
+Pro+Prs+2s+Nom+Stress:u # ;
+Pro+Prs+2s+Nom+Unstress:u # ;
+Pro+Prs+2s+Obl+Stress:ei # ;
+Pro+Prs+2s+Obl+Unstress:e # ;
+Pro+Prs+2s+Obl+Unstress+Gram/Liason:0 # ;

+Pro+Poss+2s+Masc+Nom+Sg+Unstress:es # ;
+Pro+Poss+2s+Masc+Nom+Sg+Unstress:is # ;
+Pro+Poss+2s+Masc+Obl+Sg+Unstress:on # ;
+Pro+Poss+2s+Masc+Obl+Sg+Unstress:un # ;
+Pro+Poss+2s+Masc+Nom+Pl+Unstress:i # ;
+Pro+Poss+2s+Masc+Obl+Pl+Unstress:es # ;
+Pro+Poss+2s+Fem+Nom+Sg+Unstress:a # ;
+Pro+Poss+2s+Fem+Nom+Sg+Unstress+Gram/Liason:0 # ;
+Pro+Poss+2s+Fem+Obl+Sg+Unstress:a # ;
+Pro+Poss+2s+Fem+Obl+Sg+Unstress+Gram/Liason:0 # ;
+Pro+Poss+2s+Fem+Nom+Pl+Unstress:es # ;
+Pro+Poss+2s+Fem+Obl+Pl+Unstress:es # ;

+Pro+Poss+2s+Masc+Nom+Sg+Stress:uens # ;
+Pro+Poss+2s+Masc+Obl+Sg+Stress:uen # ;
+Pro+Poss+2s+Masc+Nom+Pl+Stress:uen # ;
+Pro+Poss+2s+Masc+Obl+Pl+Stress:uens # ;
+Pro+Poss+2s+Fem+Nom+Sg+Stress:oe # ;
+Pro+Poss+2s+Fem+Obl+Sg+Stress:oe # ;
+Pro+Poss+2s+Fem+Nom+Pl+Stress:oes # ;
+Pro+Poss+2s+Fem+Obl+Pl+Stress:oes # ;

LEXICON 3SgMasc
+Pro+Prs+3s+Masc+Nom+Stress:il # ;
+Pro+Prs+3s+Masc+Nom+Stress+Err/Obsc:ilh # ;
+Pro+Prs+3s+Masc+Nom+Unstress:il # ;
+Pro+Prs+3s+Masc+Nom+Untress+Err/Obsc:ilh # ;
+Pro+Prs+3s+Masc+Obl+Dir+Unstress:le # ; ! Also ly?
+Pro+Prs+3s+Masc+Obl+Indir+Unstress:l%{I%} # ;
+Pro+Prs+3s+Masc+Obl+Stress:lui # ;

LEXICON 3SgFem
+Pro+Prs+3s+Fem+Nom+Stress:ele # ;
+Pro+Prs+3s+Fem+Nom+Stress:elle # ;
+Pro+Prs+3s+Fem+Nom+Unstress:ele # ;
+Pro+Prs+3s+Fem+Nom+Unstress:elle # ;
+Pro+Prs+3s+Fem+Obl+Dir+Unstress:la # ;
+Pro+Prs+3s+Fem+Obl+Dir+Unstress+Gram/Liason:l # ;
+Pro+Prs+3s+Fem+Obl+Indir+Unstress:l%{I%} # ;
+Pro+Prs+3s+Fem+Obl+Stress:l%{I%} # ;

LEXICON 3SgNeut
+Pro+Prs+3s+Neut+Nom+Stress:il # ;
+Pro+Prs+3s+Neut+Nom+Stress:on # ;
+Pro+Prs+3s+Neut+Nom+Stress:om # ;
+Pro+Prs+3s+Neut+Nom+Stress:un # ;
+Pro+Prs+3s+Neut+Nom+Stress:um # ;
+Pro+Prs+3s+Neut+Nom+Unstress:il # ;
+Pro+Prs+3s+Neut+Obl+Unstress:le # ; ! Also ly?
+Pro+Prs+3s+Neut+Obl+Unstress+Gram/Liason:l # ;

LEXICON 3SgRefl
+Pro+Prs+3s+Refl+Obl+Stress:ei # ;
+Pro+Prs+3s+Refl+Obl+Unstress:e # ;
+Pro+Prs+3s+Refl+Obl+Unstress+Gram/Liason:0 # ;

LEXICON 3SgPoss
+Pro+Poss+3s+Masc+Nom+Sg+Unstress:es # ;
+Pro+Poss+3s+Masc+Nom+Sg+Unstress:is # ;
+Pro+Poss+3s+Masc+Obl+Sg+Unstress:on # ;
+Pro+Poss+3s+Masc+Obl+Sg+Unstress:un # ;
+Pro+Poss+3s+Masc+Obl+Sg+Unstress:en # ;
+Pro+Poss+3s+Masc+Nom+Pl+Unstress:i # ;
+Pro+Poss+3s+Masc+Obl+Pl+Unstress:es # ;
+Pro+Poss+3s+Fem+Nom+Sg+Unstress:a # ;
+Pro+Poss+3s+Fem+Nom+Sg+Unstress+Gram/Liason:0 # ;
+Pro+Poss+3s+Fem+Obl+Sg+Unstress:a # ;
+Pro+Poss+3s+Fem+Obl+Sg+Unstress+Gram/Liason:0 # ;
+Pro+Poss+3s+Fem+Nom+Pl+Unstress:es # ;
+Pro+Poss+3s+Fem+Obl+Pl+Unstress:es # ;

! Verify sien forms
+Pro+Poss+3s+Masc+Nom+Sg+Stress:uens # ;
+Pro+Poss+3s+Masc+Nom+Sg+Stress:iens # ;
+Pro+Poss+3s+Masc+Obl+Sg+Stress:uen # ;
+Pro+Poss+3s+Masc+Obl+Sg+Stress:ien # ;
+Pro+Poss+3s+Masc+Nom+Pl+Stress:uen # ;
+Pro+Poss+3s+Masc+Nom+Pl+Stress:ien # ;
+Pro+Poss+3s+Masc+Obl+Pl+Stress:uens # ;
+Pro+Poss+3s+Masc+Obl+Pl+Stress:iens # ;
+Pro+Poss+3s+Fem+Nom+Sg+Stress:oe # ;
+Pro+Poss+3s+Fem+Obl+Sg+Stress:oe # ;
+Pro+Poss+3s+Fem+Nom+Pl+Stress:oes # ;
+Pro+Poss+3s+Fem+Obl+Pl+Stress:oes # ;

LEXICON 1Pl
+Pro+Prs+1p+Nom+Stress+Gram/Early:s # ;
+Pro+Prs+1p+Nom+Unstress+Gram/Early:s # ;
+Pro+Prs+1p+Obl+Stress+Gram/Early:s # ;
+Pro+Prs+1p+Obl+Unstress+Gram/Early:s # ;

+Pro+Prs+1p+Nom+Stress+Gram/Early:us # ;
+Pro+Prs+1p+Nom+Unstress+Gram/Early:us # ;
+Pro+Prs+1p+Obl+Stress+Gram/Early:us # ;
+Pro+Prs+1p+Obl+Unstress+Gram/Early:us # ;

+Pro+Poss+1p+Masc+Nom+Sg+Unstress:stre # ; ! Alternate form of nostre = no?
+Pro+Poss+1p+Masc+Obl+Sg+Unstress:stre # ;
+Pro+Poss+1p+Masc+Nom+Pl+Unstress:stre # ;
+Pro+Poss+1p+Masc+Obl+Pl+Unstress:z # ;
+Pro+Poss+1p+Fem+Nom+Sg+Unstress:stre # ;
+Pro+Poss+1p+Fem+Obl+Sg+Unstress:stre # ;
+Pro+Poss+1p+Fem+Nom+Pl+Unstress:z # ;
+Pro+Poss+1p+Fem+Obl+Pl+Unstress:z # ;

+Pro+Poss+1p+Masc+Nom+Sg+Stress:stre # ;
+Pro+Poss+1p+Masc+Obl+Sg+Stress:stre # ;
+Pro+Poss+1p+Masc+Nom+Pl+Stress:stre # ;
+Pro+Poss+1p+Masc+Obl+Pl+Stress:stres # ;
+Pro+Poss+1p+Masc+Obl+Pl+Stress:z # ;
+Pro+Poss+1p+Fem+Nom+Sg+Stress:stre # ;
+Pro+Poss+1p+Fem+Obl+Sg+Stress:stre # ;
+Pro+Poss+1p+Fem+Nom+Pl+Stress:stres # ;
+Pro+Poss+1p+Fem+Obl+Pl+Stress:stres # ;
+Pro+Poss+1p+Fem+Nom+Pl+Stress:z # ;
+Pro+Poss+1p+Fem+Obl+Pl+Stress:z # ;

LEXICON 2Pl
+Pro+Prs+2p+Nom+Stress:vos # ;
+Pro+Prs+2p+Nom+Stress:vus # ;
+Pro+Prs+2p+Nom+Unstress:vos # ;
+Pro+Prs+2p+Nom+Unstress:vus # ;
+Pro+Prs+2p+Obl+Stress:vos # ;
+Pro+Prs+2p+Obl+Stress:vus # ;
+Pro+Prs+2p+Obl+Unstress:vos # ;
+Pro+Prs+2p+Obl+Unstress:vus # ;

+Pro+Prs+2p+Nom+Stress:vous # ;
+Pro+Prs+2p+Nom+Unstress:vous # ;
+Pro+Prs+2p+Obl+Stress:vous # ;
+Pro+Prs+2p+Obl+Unstress:vous # ;

+Pro+Poss+2p+Masc+Nom+Sg+Unstress:vostre # ;
+Pro+Poss+2p+Masc+Obl+Sg+Unstress:vostre # ;
+Pro+Poss+2p+Masc+Nom+Pl+Unstress:vostre # ;
+Pro+Poss+2p+Masc+Obl+Pl+Unstress:voz # ;
+Pro+Poss+2p+Fem+Nom+Sg+Unstress:vostre # ;
+Pro+Poss+2p+Fem+Obl+Sg+Unstress:vostre # ;
+Pro+Poss+2p+Fem+Nom+Pl+Unstress:voz # ;
+Pro+Poss+2p+Fem+Obl+Pl+Unstress:voz # ;

+Pro+Poss+2p+Masc+Nom+Sg+Stress:vostre # ;
+Pro+Poss+2p+Masc+Obl+Sg+Stress:vostre # ;
+Pro+Poss+2p+Masc+Nom+Pl+Stress:vostre # ;
+Pro+Poss+2p+Masc+Obl+Pl+Stress:vostres # ;
+Pro+Poss+2p+Masc+Obl+Pl+Stress:voz # ;
+Pro+Poss+2p+Fem+Nom+Sg+Stress:vostre # ;
+Pro+Poss+2p+Fem+Obl+Sg+Stress:vostre # ;
+Pro+Poss+2p+Fem+Nom+Pl+Stress:vostres # ;
+Pro+Poss+2p+Fem+Obl+Pl+Stress:vostres # ;
+Pro+Poss+2p+Fem+Nom+Pl+Stress:voz # ;
+Pro+Poss+2p+Fem+Obl+Pl+Stress:voz # ;

LEXICON 3PlMasc
+Pro+Prs+3p+Masc+Nom+Stress:il # ;
+Pro+Prs+3p+Masc+Nom+Stress:ils # ;
+Pro+Prs+3p+Masc+Nom+Stress:ilz # ;
+Pro+Prs+3p+Masc+Nom+Stress+Err/Obsc:i # ;
+Pro+Prs+3p+Masc+Nom+Stress+Err/Obsc:ilh # ;
+Pro+Prs+3p+Masc+Nom+Unstress:il # ;
+Pro+Prs+3p+Masc+Nom+Unstress+Err/Obsc:i # ;
+Pro+Prs+3p+Masc+Nom+Unstress+Err/Obsc:ilh # ;
+Pro+Prs+3p+Masc+Obl+Dir+Stress:els # ;
+Pro+Prs+3p+Masc+Obl+Dir+Stress:euls # ;
+Pro+Prs+3p+Masc+Obl+Dir+Stress:eulx # ; ! Verify
+Pro+Prs+3p+Masc+Obl+Dir+Unstress:les # ;
+Pro+Prs+3p+Masc+Obl+Indir+Stress:lor # ;
+Pro+Prs+3p+Masc+Obl+Indir+Stress:lur # ;
+Pro+Prs+3p+Masc+Obl+Indir+Unstress:lor # ;

LEXICON 3PlFem
+Pro+Prs+3p+Fem+Nom+Stress:eles # ;
+Pro+Prs+3p+Fem+Nom+Stress:elles # ;
+Pro+Prs+3p+Fem+Nom+Unstress:eles # ;
+Pro+Prs+3p+Fem+Nom+Unstress:elles # ;
+Pro+Prs+3p+Fem+Obl+Dir+Stress:eles # ;
+Pro+Prs+3p+Fem+Obl+Dir+Stress:elles # ;
+Pro+Prs+3p+Fem+Obl+Dir+Unstress:les # ;
+Pro+Prs+3p+Fem+Obl+Indir+Stress:lor # ;
+Pro+Prs+3p+Fem+Obl+Indir+Unstress:lor # ;
