src/fst/stems/pronouns.lexc
je: 1Sg "I" ;
nous:no 1Pl "we" ;
tu:t 2Sg "you(sing)" ;
vous: 2Pl "you(pl)" ;
il: 3SgMasc "he" ;
elle: 3SgFem "she" ;
il: 3SgNeut "it" ;
se:s 3SgRefl "itself" ;
ils: 3PlMasc "they(masc)" ;
elles: 3PlFem "they(fem)" ;
son:s 3SgPoss "his/her/its" ;
